Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1146
Damages.

Whenever damages are recoverable, the plaintiff may claim and recover any rate of damages to which he may be entitled for the cause of action established.

R.S.1867, Code § 319, p. 448;

R.S.1913, § 7887;

C.S.1922, § 8829;

C.S.1929, § 20-1146;

R.S.1943, § 25-1146.

Public perceptions of a defect when the evidence demonstrates there is none is an improper basis for recovery. de Vries v. L & L Custom Builders, 310 Neb. 543, 968 N.W.2d 64 (2021).